Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF820.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, subdivision 1e, is amended to read: Subd. 1e. Truck; tractor; combination; exceptions. (a) On trucks and tractors except those in this chapter defined as farm trucks and on truck-tractor and semitrailer combinations except those defined as farm combinations, the tax based on total gross weight shall be graduated according to the Minnesota base rate schedule prescribed in this subdivision, but in no event less than $120. Minnesota Base Rate Schedule Scheduled taxes include five percent surtax provided for in subdivision 14 TOTAL GROSS WEIGHT IN POUNDS TAX A 0 - 1,500 $ 15 B 1,501 - 3,000 20 C 3,001 - 4,500 25 D 4,501 - 6,000 35 E 6,001 - 10,000 45 F 10,001 - 12,000 70 G 12,001 - 15,000 105 H 15,001 - 18,000 145 I 18,001 - 21,000 190 J 21,001 - 26,000 270 K 26,001 - 33,000 360 L 33,001 - 39,000 475 M 39,001 - 45,000 595 N 45,001 - 51,000 715 O 51,001 - 57,000 865 P 57,001 - 63,000 1,015 Q 63,001 - 69,000 1,185 R 69,001 - 73,280 1,325 S 73,281 - 78,000 1,595 T 78,001 - deleted text begin 80,000 deleted text end new text begin 108,000 new text end 1,760 (b) For purposes of the Minnesota base rate schedule, for vehicles with six or more axles in the "S" and "T" categories, the base rates are $1,520 and $1,620 respectively. (c) For each vehicle with a gross weight in excess of deleted text begin 80,000deleted text end new text begin 108,000new text end pounds an additional tax of $50 is imposed for each ton or fraction thereof in excess of deleted text begin 80,000deleted text end new text begin 108,000new text end pounds, subject to subdivision 12 or section 169.86, subdivision 5a, as applicable. (d) For purposes of registration identification, for vehicles registered in the "O" category, the owner must declare at the time of registration whether the vehicle will carry a weight of 55,000 pounds or more and therefore be subject to the federal heavy vehicle use tax. For those owners who declare a weight less than 55,000 pounds, a distinctive weight sticker must be issued and the owner is restricted to a gross vehicle weight of less than 55,000 pounds. (e) Truck-tractors except those herein defined as farm vehicles shall be taxed in accordance with the foregoing gross weight tax schedule on the basis of the combined gross weight of the truck-tractor and any semitrailer or semitrailers which the applicant proposes to combine with the truck-tractor. (f) On trucks, truck-tractors and semitrailer combinations, except those defined as farm trucks and farm combinations, the tax for each of the first eight years of vehicle life is 100 percent of the tax imposed in the Minnesota base rate schedule, and during the ninth and succeeding years of vehicle life, the tax is 75 percent of the Minnesota base rate prescribed by this subdivision. (g) For the purpose of registration, trailers coupled with a truck-tractor, semitrailer combination are semitrailers. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Application; cancellation; excessive gross weight forbidden. (a) The applicant for all licenses based on gross weight shall state the unloaded weight of the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer and the maximum load the applicant proposes to carry on it, the sum of which constitutes the gross weight upon which the license tax must be paid. However, the declared gross weight upon which the tax is paid must not be less than 1-1/4 times the declared unloaded weight of the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer to be registered, except recreational vehicles taxed under subdivision 1g, school buses taxed under subdivision 18, and tow trucks or towing vehicles defined in section 168B.011, subdivision 12a. The gross weight of a tow truck or towing vehicle is the actual weight of the tow truck or towing vehicle fully equipped, but does not include the weight of a wrecked or disabled vehicle towed or drawn by the tow truck or towing vehicle. (b) deleted text begin Except as provided by special permit issued under section 169.86,deleted text end The gross weight of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer must not exceed the gross weight upon which the license tax has been paid by more than four percent or 1,000 pounds, whichever is greaterdeleted text begin ; provided that, a vehicle transporting unfinished forest products on a highway, other than a highway that is part of the system of interstate and defense highways, unless a federal exemption is granted, in accordance with paragraph (d), clause (3):deleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (1) shall not exceed its gross vehicle weight upon which the license tax has been paid, or gross axle weight on any axle, by more than five percent and, notwithstanding other law to the contrary, is not subject to any fee, fine, or other assessment or penalty for exceeding a gross vehicle or axle weight by up to five percent. This clause applies year round to suppliers of unfinished forest products to mills; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2) is not subject to any provision of paragraph (d) or chapter deleted text end deleted text begin 169 deleted text end deleted text begin limiting the gross axle weight of any individual axle unless the entire vehicle also exceeds its gross vehicle weight plus its weight allowance allowed in clause (1) and plus any weight allowance permitted under section 169.826 or 169.8261, in which case the vehicle is subject to all applicable penalties for excess weight violations. deleted text end (c) The gross weight of the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer for which the license tax is paid must be indicated by a distinctive character on the license plate or plates except as provided in subdivision 12 or section 169.86, subdivision 5a, as applicable, and the plate or plates must be kept clean and clearly visible at all times. (d) The owner, driver, or user of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, upon conviction for transporting a gross weight in excess of the gross weight for which it was registered or for operating a vehicle with an axle weight exceeding the maximum lawful axle load weight, is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to increased registration or reregistration according to the following schedule: (1) Upon conviction for transporting a gross weight in excess of the gross weight for which a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is registered by more than the allowance set forth in paragraph (b) but less than 25 percent, or for operating or using a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer with an axle weight exceeding the maximum lawful axle load as provided in sections 169.822 to 169.829 by more than the allowance set forth in paragraph (b) but less than 25 percent, the owner, driver, or user of the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer used to commit the violation, in addition to any penalty imposed for the misdemeanor, shall apply to the registrar to increase the authorized gross weight to be carried on the vehicle to a weight equal to or greater than the gross weight the owner, driver, or user was convicted of carrying. The increase is computed for the balance of the calendar year on the basis of 1/12 of the annual tax for each month remaining in the calendar year beginning with the first day of the month in which the violation occurred. If the additional registration tax computed upon that weight, plus the tax already paid, amounts to more than the regular tax for the maximum gross weight permitted for the vehicle under deleted text begin sections 169.822 to 169.829deleted text end new text begin section 169.824new text end , that additional amount must nevertheless be paid into the highway fund, but the additional tax thus paid does not authorize or permit any person to operate the vehicle with a gross weight in excess of the maximum legal weight as provided by deleted text begin sections 169.822 to 169.829deleted text end new text begin section 169.824new text end . Unless the owner within 30 days after a conviction applies to increase the authorized weight and pays the additional tax as provided in this section, the registrar shall revoke the registration on the vehicle and demand the return of the registration card and plates issued on that registration. (2) Upon conviction of an owner, driver, or user of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer for transporting a gross weight in excess of the gross weight for which the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer was registered by 25 percent or more or for operating or using the vehicle or trailer with an axle weight exceeding the maximum lawful axle load as provided in sections 169.822 to 169.829 by 25 percent or more, and in addition to any penalty imposed for the misdemeanor, the registrar shall either (i) cancel the reciprocity privileges on the vehicle involved if the vehicle is being operated under reciprocity or (ii) if the vehicle is not being operated under reciprocity, cancel the certificate of registration on the vehicle operated and demand the return of the registration certificate and registration plates. The registrar may not cancel the registration or reciprocity privileges for any vehicle found in violation of seasonal load restrictions imposed under section 169.87 unless the axle weight exceeds the year-round weight limit for the highway on which the violation occurred. The registrar may investigate any allegation of gross weight violations and demand that the operator show cause why all future operating privileges in the state should not be revoked unless the additional tax assessed is paid. deleted text begin (3) Clause (1) does not apply to the first haul of unprocessed or raw farm products or unfinished forest products, when the registered gross weight is not exceeded by more than ten percent. For purposes of this clause, "first haul" means (i) the first, continuous transportation of unprocessed or raw farm products from the place of production or on-farm storage site to any other location within 100 miles of the place of production or on-farm storage site, or (ii) the continuous or noncontinuous transportation of unfinished forest products from the place of production to the place of final processing or manufacture located within 200 miles of the place of production. deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end When the registration on a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is revoked by the registrar according to this section, the vehicle must not be operated on the highways of the state until it is registered or reregistered, as the case may be, and new plates issued, and the registration fee is the annual tax for the total gross weight of the vehicle at the time of violation. The reregistration pursuant to this subdivision of any vehicle operating under reciprocity agreements pursuant to section 168.181 or 168.187 must be at the full annual registration fee without regard to the percentage of vehicle miles traveled in this state. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Additional tax for excessive gross weight. (a) Whenever an owner has registered a vehicle and paid the tax as provided in subdivisions 1 to 1g, on the basis of a selected gross weight of the vehicle and thereafter such owner desires to operate such vehicle with a greater gross weight than that for which the tax has been paid, such owner shall be permitted to reregister such vehicle by paying the additional tax due thereon for the remainder of the calendar year for which such vehicle has been reregistered, the additional tax computed pro rata by the month, 1/12 of the annual tax due for each month of the year remaining in the calendar year, beginning with the first day of the month in which such owner desires to operate the vehicle with the greater weight. In computing the additional tax as aforesaid, the owner shall be given credit for the unused portion of the tax previously paid computed pro rata by the month, 1/12 of the annual tax paid for each month of the year remaining in the calendar year beginning with the first day of the month in which such owner desires to operate the vehicle with the greater weight. An owner will be permitted one reduction of gross weight or change of registration per year, which will result in a refund. This refund will be prorated monthly beginning with the first day of the month after such owner applies to amend the registration. The application for amendment shall be accompanied by a fee of $3, and all fees shall be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. Provided, however, the owner of a vehicle may reregister the vehicle for a weight of more than deleted text begin 81,000deleted text end new text begin 109,000new text end pounds for one or more 30-day periods. For each 30-day period, the additional tax shall be equal to 1/12 of the difference between the annual tax for the weight at which the vehicle is registered and reregistered. (b) This subdivision does not apply to the owner of a vehicle who pays the additional tax for excessive gross weight under section 169.86, subdivision 5a, when buying a permit to operate with the greater gross weight. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.824, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Table of axle weight limits. (a) No vehicle or combination of vehicles equipped with pneumatic tires shall be operated upon the highways of this state where the total gross weight on any group of two or more consecutive axles of any vehicle or combination of vehicles exceeds that given in the following axle weight limits table for the distance between the centers of the first and last axles of any group of two or more consecutive axles under consideration. Unless otherwise noted, the distance between axles must be measured longitudinally to the nearest even foot, and when the measurement is a fraction of exactly one-half foot the next largest whole number in feet shall be used, except that when the distance between axles is more than three feet four inches and less than three feet six inches the distance of four feet shall be used. Axle Weight Limits Maximum gross weight in pounds on a group of 2 3 4 Distances in feet between centers of foremost and rearmost axles of a group consecutive axles of a 2-axle vehicle or any combination of vehicles having a total of 2 or more axles consecutive axles of a 3-axle vehicle or any combination of vehicles having a total of 3 or more axles consecutive axles of a 4-axle vehicle or any combination of vehicles having a total of 4 or more axles 4 34,000 5 34,000 6 34,000 7 34,000 34,000 8 34,000 34,000 8 plus 34,000 42,000 (38,000) 9 35,000 43,000 (39,000) 10 36,000 43,500 49,000 (40,000) 11 36,000 44,500 49,500 12 45,000 50,000 13 46,000 51,000 14 46,500 51,500 15 47,500 52,000 16 48,000 53,000 17 49,000 53,500 18 49,500 54,000 19 50,500 55,000 20 51,000 55,500 21 52,000 56,000 22 52,500 57,000 23 53,500 57,500 24 54,000 58,000 25 (55,000) 59,000 26 (55,500) 59,500 27 (56,500) 60,000 28 (57,000) 61,000 29 (58,000) 61,500 30 (58,500) 62,000 31 (59,500) 63,000 32 (60,000) 63,500 33 64,000 34 65,000 35 65,500 36 66,000 37 67,000 38 67,500 39 68,000 40 69,000 41 69,500 42 70,000 43 71,000 44 71,500 45 72,000 46 72,500 47 (73,500) 48 (74,000) 49 (74,500) 50 (75,500) 51 (76,000) 52 (76,500) 53 (77,500) 54 (78,000) 55 (78,500) 56 (79,500) 57 (80,000) (b) The maximum gross weight on a group of three consecutive axles, where the distance between centers of foremost and rearmost axles of any axle group is seven feet or eight feet, is 34,000 pounds, except for vehicles manufactured before August 1, 1991. Notwithstanding any lesser weight shown in the axle weight limits table, for vehicles manufactured before August 1, 1991: (1) the maximum gross weight on a group of three consecutive axles, where the distance between centers of foremost and rearmost axles of any axle group is seven feet, is 37,000 pounds; and (2) the maximum gross weight on a group of three consecutive axles, where the distance between centers of foremost and rearmost axles of any axle group is eight feet, is 38,500 pounds. (c) "8 plus" refers to any distance greater than eight feet but less than nine feet. Axle Weight Limits (continued) Maximum gross weight in pounds on a group of 5 6 7 8 Distances in feet between centers of foremost and rearmost axles of a group consecutive axles of a 5-axle vehicle or any combination of vehicles having a total of 5 or more axles consecutive axles of a 6-axle vehicle or any combination of vehicles having a total of 6 or more axles consecutive axles of a 7-axle vehicle or any combination of vehicles having a total of 7 or more axles consecutive axles of an 8-axle vehicle or any combination of vehicles having a total of 8 or more axles 14 57,000 15 57,500 16 58,000 17 59,000 18 59,500 19 60,000 20 60,500 66,000 72,000 21 61,500 67,000 72,500 22 62,000 67,500 73,000 23 62,500 68,000 73,500 24 63,000 68,500 74,000 25 64,000 69,000 75,000 26 64,500 70,000 75,500 27 65,000 70,500 76,000 28 65,500 71,000 76,500 29 66,500 71,500 77,000 30 67,000 72,000 77,500 31 67,500 73,000 78,500 32 68,000 73,500 79,000 33 69,000 74,000 79,500 34 69,500 74,500 80,000 35 70,000 75,000 (80,500) (86,000) 36 70,500 76,000 (81,000) (86,500) 37 71,500 76,500 (81,500) (87,000) 38 72,000 77,000 (82,000) (87,500) 39 72,500 77,500 (82,500) (88,500) 40 73,000 78,000 (83,500) (89,000) 41 74,000 79,000 (84,000) (89,500) 42 74,500 79,500 (84,500) (90,000) 43 75,000 80,000 (85,000) (90,500) 44 75,500 (80,500) (85,500) (91,000) 45 76,500 (81,000) (86,000) (91,500) 46 77,000 (81,500) (87,000) (92,500) 47 77,500 (82,000) (87,500) (93,000) 48 78,000 (83,000) (88,000) (93,500) 49 79,000 (83,500) (88,500) (94,000) 50 79,500 (84,000) (89,000) (94,500) 51 80,000 (84,500) (89,500) (95,000) 52 (80,500) (85,000) (90,500) (95,500) 53 (81,000) (86,000) (91,000) (96,500) 54 (81,500) (86,500) (91,500) (97,000) 55 (82,500) (87,000) (92,000) (97,500) 56 (83,000) (87,500) (92,500) (98,000) 57 (83,500) (88,000) (93,000) (98,500) 58 (84,000) (89,000) (94,000) (99,000) 59 (85,000) (89,500) (94,500) (99,500) 60 (85,500) (90,000) (95,000) (100,500) 61 (95,500) (101,000) 62 (96,000) (101,500) 63 (96,500) (102,000) 64 (97,000) (102,500) 65 (103,000) 66 (103,500) 67 (104,500) 68 (105,000) 69 (105,500) 70 (106,000) 71 (106,500) 72 (107,000) 73 (107,500) 74 (108,000) (d) The gross weights shown without parentheses in the axle weight limits table are allowed on unpaved streets and highways, unless posted to a lesser weight under section 169.87, subdivision 1. The gross weights shown in this table, whether within or without parentheses, are allowed on paved streets and highways, unless posted to a lesser weight under section 169.87, subdivision 1. deleted text begin Gross weights in excess of 80,000 pounds require an overweight permit under this chapter, unless otherwise allowed under section 169.826.deleted text end (e) Notwithstanding any lesser weight shown in the axle weight limits table, but subject to the restrictions on gross vehicle weights in subdivision 2, clauses (1) and (2), two consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a gross load of 34,000 pounds each and a combined gross load of 68,000 pounds provided the overall distance between the first and last axles of the consecutive sets of tandem axles is 36 feet or more. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.824, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Gross vehicle weight of all axles. The gross vehicle weight of all axles of a vehicle or combination of vehicles must not exceeddeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1) 80,000deleted text end new text begin 108,000new text end pounds for any vehicle or combination of vehicles on all streets and highways, unless posted at a lower axle weight under section 169.87, subdivision 1deleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (2) 88,000 pounds for any vehicle or combination of vehicles with six or more axles while exclusively engaged in hauling livestock on all state trunk highways other than interstate highways, if the vehicle has a permit under section 169.86, subdivision 5, paragraph (j). deleted text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.8261, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Six-axle and over-width vehicle permit. (a) A road authority may issue an annual permit authorizing a vehicle or combination of vehicles with a total of six or more axles to haul raw or unfinished forest products by the most direct route to the nearest paved highway on any highway with gross weights permitted under sections 169.823 to 169.829 and be operated withdeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1) a gross vehicle weight of up to: deleted text end deleted text begin (i) 90,000 pounds; and deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) 99,000 pounds during the period set by the commissioner under section 169.826, subdivision 1; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end a total outside width of the vehicle or the load that does not exceed 114 inches. (b) In addition to the conditions in subdivision 2, a vehicle or combination of vehicles that is operated with a permit under this subdivision and transporting a load that exceeds 108 inches must: (1) display red or orange flags, 18 inches square, as markers at the front and rear and on both sides of the load; and (2) not be operated on any road in a metropolitan county, as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 4. (c) A vehicle or combination of vehicles with a permit under this subdivision may only be operated on an interstate highway: (1) as provided under United States Code, title 23, section 127(q), for operation on the specified segment of marked Interstate Highway 35; or (2) if the gross vehicle weight does not exceed 80,000 pounds. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.8261, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Conditions. (a) A vehicle or combination of vehicles operated under this section must: deleted text begin (1) comply with seasonal load restrictions in effect between the dates set by the commissioner under section 169.87, subdivision 2; deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end comply with bridge load limits posted under section 169.84; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end be equipped and operated with six or more axles and brakes on all wheels; deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end be operated under a permit issued by each road authority having jurisdiction over a road on which the vehicle is operated, if required by the road authority; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end obey all road and bridge postings, including those pertaining to lane or roadway width; and deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end not exceed 20,000 pounds gross weight on any single axle. (b) A vehicle operated under this section may exceed the legal axle weight limits listed in section 169.824 by not more than 12.5 percentdeleted text begin ; except that, the weight limits may be exceeded by not more than 23.75 percent during the time when seasonal increases are authorized under section 169.826, subdivision 1deleted text end . Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.86, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Permit authorities; restrictions. (a) The commissioner, with respect to highways under the commissioner's jurisdiction, and local authorities, with respect to highways under their jurisdiction, may, in their discretion, upon application in writing and good cause being shown therefor, issue a special permit, in writing, authorizing the applicant to move a vehicle or combination of vehicles of a size deleted text begin or weightdeleted text end of vehicle or load exceeding the maximum specified in this chapterdeleted text begin , exceeding the gross weight for which the vehicle is registered under chapter 168deleted text end , or otherwise not in conformity with the provisions of this chapter, upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the party granting such permit and for the maintenance of which such party is responsible. (b) Permits relating to over-width, over-length manufactured homes shall not be issued to persons other than manufactured home dealers or manufacturers for movement of new units owned by the manufactured home dealer or manufacturer, until the person has presented a statement from the county auditor and treasurer where the unit is presently located, stating that all personal and real property taxes have been paid. Upon payment of the most recent single year delinquent personal property or current year taxes only, the county auditor or treasurer must issue a taxes paid statement to a manufactured home dealer or a financial institution desiring to relocate a manufactured home that has been repossessed. This statement must be dated within 30 days of the contemplated move. The statement from the county auditor and treasurer where the unit is presently located, stating that all personal and real property taxes have been paid, may be made by telephone. If the statement is obtained by telephone, the permit shall contain the date and time of the telephone call and the names of the persons in the auditor's office and treasurer's office who verified that all personal and real property taxes had been paid. (c) The commissioner may not grant a permit authorizing the movement, in a three-vehicle combination, of a semitrailer or trailer that exceeds 28-1/2 feet, except that the commissioner (1) may renew a permit that was granted before April 16, 1984, for the movement of a semitrailer or trailer that exceeds the length limitation in section 169.81, subdivision 2, or (2) may grant a permit authorizing the transportation of empty trailers that exceed 28-1/2 feet when using a B-train hitching mechanism as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 23, section 658.5, from a point of manufacture in the state to the state border. (d) The state as to state trunk highways, a statutory or home rule charter city as to streets in the city, or a town as to roads in the town, may issue permits authorizing the transportation of combinations of vehicles exceeding the limitations in section 169.81, subdivisions 2a and 3, over highways, streets, or roads within its boundaries. Combinations of vehicles authorized by this paragraph may be restricted as to the use of state trunk highways by the commissioner, to the use of streets by the city road authority, and to the use of roads by the town road authority. Nothing in this paragraph or section 169.81, subdivisions 2a and 3, alters or changes the authority vested in local authorities under section 169.04. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.86, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Fees; proceeds deposited; appropriation. The commissioner, with respect to highways under the commissioner's jurisdiction, may charge a fee for each permit issued. The fee for an annual permit that expires by law on the date of the vehicle registration expiration must be based on the proportion of the year that remains until the expiration date. All fees for permits issued by the commissioner of transportation must be deposited as provided in paragraph (i) and in section 174.525. Except for those annual permits for which the permit fees are specified elsewhere in this chapter, the fees are: (a) $15 for each single trip permit. (b) $36 for each job permit. A job permit may be issued for like loads carried on a specific route for a period not to exceed two months. "Like loads" means loads of the same productdeleted text begin , weight,deleted text end and dimension. (c) $60 for an annual permit to be issued for a period not to exceed 12 consecutive months. Annual permits may be issued for: (1) motor vehicles used to alleviate a temporary crisis adversely affecting the safety or well-being of the public; (2) motor vehicles that travel on interstate highways and carry loads authorized under subdivision 1a; deleted text begin (3) motor vehicles operating with gross weights authorized under section 169.826, subdivision 1a; deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end special pulpwood vehicles described in section 169.863; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end motor vehicles bearing snowplow blades not exceeding ten feet in width; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end noncommercial transportation of a boat by the owner or user of the boat; and deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end motor vehicles carrying bales of agricultural products authorized under section 169.862. (d) $120 for an oversize annual permit to be issued for a period not to exceed 12 consecutive months. Annual permits may be issued for: (1) mobile cranes; (2) construction equipment, machinery, and supplies; (3) manufactured homes and manufactured storage buildings; (4) implements of husbandry; (5) double-deck buses; (6) commercial boat hauling and transporting waterfront structures, including, but not limited to, portable boat docks and boat lifts; and (7) three-vehicle combinations consisting of two empty, newly manufactured trailers for cargo, horses, or livestock, not to exceed 28-1/2 feet per trailer; provided, however, the permit allows the vehicles to be moved from a trailer manufacturer to a trailer dealer only while operating on twin-trailer routes designated under section 169.81, subdivision 3, paragraph (c). (e) For vehicles that have axle weights exceeding the weight limitations of sections 169.823 to 169.829, an additional cost added to the fees listed above. However, this paragraph applies to any vehicle described in section 168.013, subdivision 3, paragraph (b), but only when the vehicle exceeds its gross weight allowance set forth in that paragraph, and then the additional cost is for all weight, including the allowance weight, in excess of the permitted maximum axle weight. The additional cost is equal to the product of the distance traveled times the sum of the overweight axle group cost factors shown in the following chart: Overweight Axle Group Cost Factors Weight (pounds) Cost Per Mile For Each Group Of: exceeding weight limitations on axles Two consecutive axles spaced within 8 feet or less Three consecutive axles spaced within 9 feet or less Four consecutive axles spaced within 14 feet or less 0-2,000 .12 .05 .04 2,001-4,000 .14 .06 .05 4,001-6,000 .18 .07 .06 6,001-8,000 .21 .09 .07 8,001-10,000 .26 .10 .08 10,001-12,000 .30 .12 .09 12,001-14,000 Not permitted .14 .11 14,001-16,000 Not permitted .17 .12 16,001-18,000 Not permitted .19 .15 18,001-20,000 Not permitted Not permitted .16 20,001-22,000 Not permitted Not permitted .20 The amounts added are rounded to the nearest cent for each axle or axle group. The additional cost does not apply to paragraph (c), clauses (1) and (3). For a vehicle found to exceed the appropriate maximum permitted weight, a cost-per-mile fee of 22 cents per ton, or fraction of a ton, over the permitted maximum weight is imposed in addition to the normal permit fee. Miles must be calculated based on the distance already traveled in the state plus the distance from the point of detection to a transportation loading site or unloading site within the state or to the point of exit from the state. deleted text begin (f) As an alternative to paragraph (e), an annual permit may be issued for overweight, or oversize and overweight, mobile cranes; construction equipment, machinery, and supplies; implements of husbandry; and commercial boat hauling. The fees for the permit are as follows: deleted text end deleted text begin Gross Weight (pounds) of Vehicle deleted text end deleted text begin Annual Permit Fee deleted text end deleted text begin 90,000 deleted text end deleted text begin or less deleted text end deleted text begin $200 deleted text end deleted text begin 90,001 deleted text end deleted text begin - 100,000 deleted text end deleted text begin $300 deleted text end deleted text begin 100,001 deleted text end deleted text begin - 110,000 deleted text end deleted text begin $400 deleted text end deleted text begin 110,001 deleted text end deleted text begin - 120,000 deleted text end deleted text begin $500 deleted text end deleted text begin 120,001 deleted text end deleted text begin - 130,000 deleted text end deleted text begin $600 deleted text end deleted text begin 130,001 deleted text end deleted text begin - 140,000 deleted text end deleted text begin $700 deleted text end deleted text begin 140,001 deleted text end deleted text begin - 145,000 deleted text end deleted text begin $800 deleted text end deleted text begin 145,001 deleted text end deleted text begin - 155,000 deleted text end deleted text begin $900 deleted text end deleted text begin If the gross weight of the vehicle is more than 155,000 pounds the permit fee is determined under paragraph (e). deleted text end deleted text begin (g) For vehicles which exceed the width limitations set forth in section 169.80 by more than 72 inches, an additional cost equal to $120 added to the amount in paragraph (a) when the permit is issued while seasonal load restrictions pursuant to section 169.87 are in effect. deleted text end deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end $85 for an annual permit to be issued for a period not to exceed 12 months, for refuse-compactor vehicles that carry a gross weight of not more than: 22,000 pounds on a single rear axle; 38,000 pounds on a tandem rear axle; or, subject to section 169.828, subdivision 2, 46,000 pounds on a tridem rear axle. A permit issued for up to 46,000 pounds on a tridem rear axle must limit the gross vehicle weight to not more than 62,000 pounds. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end $300 for a motor vehicle described in section 169.8261. The fee under this paragraph must be deposited as follows: (1) the first $50,000 in each fiscal year must be deposited in the trunk highway fund for costs related to administering the permit program and inspecting and posting bridges; and (2) all remaining money in each fiscal year must be deposited in the bridge inspection and signing account as provided under subdivision 5b. deleted text begin (j) $200 for an annual permit for a vehicle operating under authority of section 169.824, subdivision 2, clause (2). deleted text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.863, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Special vehicle. The commissioner may issue a permit for a vehicle that meets the following requirements: (a) There must be no more than two support points for the vehicle or for each vehicle of a vehicle combination. The support point of each axle group must be capable of distributing the load equally to each axle of the group with a variance of no more than 3,000 pounds between any two axles of the group. (b) The maximum wheel load may not exceed the tire manufacturer's recommended load or the following weight limits, whichever is less: (1) front steering axles, 550 pounds per inch; (2) other single axles, 500 pounds per inch; (3) tandem axles, 450 pounds per inch; and (4) tridem or quad axle groups, 425 pounds per inch. (c) The axle group weights must comply with the limitations of section 169.824. (d) The vehicle may not be equipped with a variable load axle, unless the variable load axle cannot be operated from the cab of the vehicle. (e) The vehicle transports pole-length pulpwood, carries a gross vehicle weight of not more than deleted text begin 82,000deleted text end new text begin 108,000new text end pounds, and has six or more axles. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.871, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Civil liability. (a) The owner or lessee of a vehicle that is operated with a gross weight in excess of a weight limit imposed under deleted text begin sections 169.823 to 169.8295, 169.84 to 169.851, and 169.87deleted text end new text begin section 169.824new text end or a shipper who ships or tenders goods for shipment in a single truck or combination vehicle that exceeds a weight limit imposed under deleted text begin sections 169.823 to 169.8295, 169.84 to 169.851, and 169.87deleted text end new text begin section 169.824new text end is liable for a civil penalty as follows: (1) if the total gross excess weight is not more than 1,000 pounds, one cent per pound for each pound in excess of the legal limit; (2) if the total gross excess weight is more than 1,000 pounds but not more than 3,000 pounds, $10 plus five cents per pound for each pound in excess of 1,000 pounds; (3) if the total gross excess weight is more than 3,000 pounds but not more than 5,000 pounds, $110 plus ten cents per pound for each pound in excess of 3,000 pounds; (4) if the total gross excess weight is more than 5,000 pounds but not more than 7,000 pounds, $310 plus 15 cents per pound for each pound in excess of 5,000 pounds; (5) if the total gross excess weight is more than 7,000 pounds, $610 plus 20 cents per pound for each pound in excess of 7,000 pounds. (b) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if a person found guilty of a violation of a weight limit imposed under this section or deleted text begin sections 169.823 to 169.8295, 169.84 to 169.851, or 169.87deleted text end new text begin section 169.824new text end is also found by the court to have knowingly and contemporaneously attempted to evade a fixed weigh station or to otherwise avoid weighing by means of stationary scales under section 169.85 or other law, the court must impose a penalty of twice the amount otherwise authorized under paragraph (a). (c) Any penalty imposed upon a defendant under this subdivision must not exceed the penalty prescribed by this subdivision. Any fine paid by the defendant in a criminal overweight action that arose from the same overweight violation is applied toward payment of the civil penalty under this subdivision. A peace officer or Department of Public Safety employee described in section 299D.06 who cites a driver for a violation of the weight limitations established by deleted text begin sections 169.81 to 169.851 and 169.87deleted text end new text begin section 169.824new text end must give written notice to the driver that the driver or another may also be liable for the civil penalties provided herein in the same or separate proceedings. (d) A penalty imposed upon the owner or lessee of a vehicle that is based on violations identified by the use of shippers' weight records under section 169.872 must not exceed an aggregate of $10,000. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.871, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Civil penalty for first two violations. Notwithstanding subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (5), a civil penalty under subdivision 1 for a violation in a motor vehicle in the course of a first haul as defined in section 168.013, subdivision 3, paragraph (d), clause (3), of a weight limit imposed under deleted text begin sections 169.823 to 169.829, 169.84 to 169.851, and 169.87deleted text end new text begin section 169.824new text end that is not preceded by two or more violations of the gross weight limits in those sections in that motor vehicle within the previous 12 months, may not exceed $150. Sec. 13. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall correct any statutory cross-references consistent with: new text end new text begin (1) the raising of the gross weight rating to 108,000 pounds; and new text end new text begin (2) the repeal of special permits for overweight vehicles. new text end Sec. 14. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 169.826, subdivisions 1, 1a, 2, 3, 4, and 7; 169.8295; 169.86, subdivisions 1a and 5a; 169.864; 169.865, subdivisions 1a, 1b, 2, 3, 4, and 5; 169.866; 169.8665; 169.868; 169.869; 169.87, subdivision 4; and 169.871, subdivision 1a, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 to 14 are effective August 1, 2026. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-01073 169.826 GROSS WEIGHT SEASONAL INCREASES. Subdivision 1. Winter increase amounts. The limitations provided in sections 169.823 to 169.829 are increased by ten percent between the dates set by the commissioner for each zone established by the commissioner based on a freezing index model each winter. Subd. 1a. Harvest season increase amount; permit. The limitations provided in sections 169.823 to 169.829 are increased by ten percent from the beginning of harvest to November 30 each year for the movement of sugar beets, carrots, and potatoes from the field of harvest to the point of the first unloading. Transfer of the product from a farm vehicle or small farm trailer, within the meaning of chapter 168, to another vehicle is not considered to be the first unloading. A permit issued under section 169.86, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), is required. The commissioner shall not issue permits under this subdivision if to do so will result in a loss of federal highway funding to the state. Subd. 2. Duration. The duration of a ten percent increase in load limits is subject to limitation by order of the commissioner, subject to implementation of springtime load restrictions. Subd. 3. Excess weight permit. When the ten percent increase is in effect, a permit is required for a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer combination that has a gross weight in excess of 80,000 pounds, an axle group weight in excess of that prescribed in section 169.824, or a single axle weight in excess of 20,000 pounds and which travels on interstate routes. Subd. 4. Weight limits set by other law. In cases where gross weights in an amount less than that set forth in sections 169.823 to 169.829 are fixed, limited, or restricted on a highway or bridge by or under another section of this chapter, the lesser gross weight as fixed, limited, or restricted may not be exceeded and must control instead of the gross weights set forth in sections 169.823 to 169.829. Subd. 7. Expiration date. Upon request of the permit applicant, the expiration date for a permit issued under this section must be the same as the expiration date of the permitted vehicle's registration. 169.8295 WEIGHT LIMITS; VEHICLES TRANSPORTING MILK. Subdivision 1. Weight limits increase. (a) The weight limitations under sections 169.823 to 169.829 are increased by ten percent for a single-unit vehicle transporting fluid milk from the point of production to (1) another point of production for additional loading, or (2) the point of first processing. (b) Notwithstanding sections 169.824, subdivision 1, paragraph (d); 169.826, subdivision 3; or other law to the contrary, a permit is not required to operate a vehicle under this section. (c) The seasonal weight increases under section 169.826, subdivision 1, do not apply to a vehicle operated under this section. Subd. 2. Requirements; restrictions. A vehicle operated under this section: (1) is subject to seasonal load restrictions under section 169.87, except as otherwise provided under section 169.87, subdivision 4; (2) is subject to bridge load limits posted under section 169.84; and (3) must not be operated with a load that exceeds the tire manufacturer's recommended load, the manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating as affixed to the vehicle, or other certification of gross vehicle weight rating under Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, sections 567.4 to 567.7. 169.86 SPECIAL PERMIT TO EXCEED HEIGHT, WIDTH, OR LOAD; FEES. Subd. 1a. Seasonal permits for certain haulers. The commissioner of transportation, upon application in writing therefor, may issue special permits annually to any hauler authorizing the hauler to move vehicles or combinations of vehicles with weights exceeding by not more than ten percent the weight limitations contained in sections 169.823 to 169.829, on interstate highways during the times and within the zones specified in sections 169.823 to 169.829. Subd. 5a. Additional tax for excessive gross weight. When a special permit is issued under this chapter, the commissioner shall collect in addition to the permit fee an additional tax for excessive gross weight, if the weight allowed under the permit is greater than the gross weight for which the vehicle is registered under section 168.013. The tax shall be calculated as the difference between the registration tax paid under section 168.013, subdivision 1e, and the additional tax that would be due under section 168.013, subdivision 1e, at the gross weight allowed under the permit, prorated by the number of days for which the permit is effective. Proceeds of the surcharge must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the highway user tax distribution fund. 169.864 SPECIAL PRODUCTS VEHICLE PERMITS. Subdivision 1. Special three-unit vehicle permit. The commissioner may issue a permit for a vehicle that transports paper products, finished forest products, or iron ore tailings and meets the following requirements: (1) is a combination of vehicles, including a truck-tractor and a semitrailer drawing one additional semitrailer, which may be equipped with an auxiliary dolly, and no semitrailer used in the three-vehicle combination has an overall length in excess of 28-1/2 feet; (2) has a maximum gross vehicle weight of 108,000 pounds; (3) complies with the axle weight limits in section 169.824; (4) complies with the tire weight limits in section 169.823 or the tire manufacturer's recommended load, whichever is less; (5) is operated only in this state on Trunk Highway marked 2 between Grand Rapids and the port of Duluth; on Trunk Highway marked 169 between Grand Rapids and its junction with Trunk Highway marked 53; on Trunk Highway marked 194 between Trunk Highway marked 2 and Trunk Highway marked 53; and on Trunk Highway marked 53; and (6) the seasonal weight increases authorized under section 169.826, subdivision 1, do not apply. Subd. 2. Special two-unit vehicle permit. The commissioner may issue a permit for a vehicle that transports paper products, finished forest products, or iron ore tailings and meets the following requirements: (1) is a combination of vehicles consisting of a truck-tractor and a single semitrailer that may exceed 48 feet, but not 53 feet, if the distance from the kingpin to the centerline of the rear axle group of the semitrailer does not exceed 43 feet; (2) has a maximum gross vehicle weight of 90,000 pounds if the vehicle combination has a total of six or more axles or 97,000 pounds if the vehicle combination has a total of seven or more axles; (3) has a maximum gross vehicle weight of 99,000 pounds during the time when seasonal weight increases authorized under section 169.826, subdivision 1, are in effect; (4) complies with the axle weight limits in section 169.824; (5) complies with the tire weight limits in section 169.823 or the tire manufacturer's recommended load, whichever is less; and (6) is operated only on the highways specified in subdivision 1, clause (5). Subd. 2a. Special tire-hauling permit. (a) The commissioner may issue a permit authorizing a vehicle used exclusively to haul earthmover tires, if the vehicle: (1) is a combination of vehicles with seven or more axles, consisting of a truck with loader and trailer, which may be equipped with an auxiliary dolly; (2) has a maximum gross vehicle weight of 108,000 pounds; (3) has a maximum width of 144 inches; (4) does not exceed the axle weight limits in sections 169.823, subdivision 1, clause (2), and 169.824, by more than 22 percent; (5) complies with the tire weight limits in section 169.823, or the tire manufacturer's recommended load, whichever is less; and (6) is operated only on the highways specified in subdivision 1, clause (5). (b) The seasonal weight increases authorized under section 169.826, subdivision 1, do not apply to permits issued under this subdivision. Subd. 3. Restrictions. Vehicles issued permits under subdivisions 1, 2, and 2a, must comply with the following restrictions: (1) the vehicle must be operated in compliance with seasonal load restrictions under section 169.87; (2) the vehicle may not be operated on the interstate highway system; and (3) the vehicle may be operated on streets or highways under the control of local authorities only upon the approval of the local authority; however, vehicles may have reasonable access to terminals and facilities for food, fuel, repairs, and rest and for continuity of route within one mile of the national network as provided by section 169.81, subdivision 3, and by Code of Federal Regulations, title 23, section 658.19. Subd. 4. Permit fee; appropriation. Vehicle permits issued under subdivision 1, clause (1), must be annual permits. The fee is $850 for each vehicle combination and must be deposited in the trunk highway fund. The fee for annual permits issued under subdivision 2 is $300 for a 90,000-pound vehicle combination or $500 for a 97,000-pound vehicle combination. The fee for annual permits issued under subdivision 2a is $850. An amount sufficient to administer the permit program is appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner for the costs of administering the permit program. 169.865 SPECIAL FARM PRODUCTS PERMITS. Subd. 1a. Definition. For purposes of this section, "qualifying agricultural products" means: (1) agricultural crops, including but not limited to corn, soybeans, oats, grain, and by-products of agricultural crops; (2) livestock, including but not limited to cattle, hogs, and poultry; (3) food crops, including but not limited to sugar beets, potatoes, carrots, and onions; (4) fluid milk; (5) seed and material used for or in livestock and poultry feed; (6) livestock manure; and (7) raw or processed grass seed. Subd. 1b. Six-axle vehicles. (a) A road authority may issue an annual permit authorizing a vehicle or combination of vehicles with a total of six or more axles to haul qualifying agricultural products and be operated with a gross vehicle weight of up to: (1) 90,000 pounds; and (2) 99,000 pounds during the period set by the commissioner under section 169.826, subdivision 1. (b) Notwithstanding subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (4), a vehicle or combination of vehicles operated under this subdivision and transporting only sealed intermodal containers may be operated on an interstate highway if allowed by the United States Department of Transportation. (c) The fee for a permit issued under this subdivision is $300, or a proportional amount as provided in section 169.86, subdivision 5. Subd. 2. Seven-axle vehicles. (a) A road authority may issue an annual permit authorizing a vehicle or combination of vehicles with a total of seven or more axles to haul qualifying agricultural products and be operated with a gross weight of up to: (1) 97,000 pounds; and (2) 99,000 pounds during the period set by the commissioner under section 169.826, subdivision 1. (b) Drivers of vehicles operating under this subdivision must comply with driver qualification requirements adopted under section 221.0314, subdivisions 2 to 5, and Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, parts 40 and 382, unless exempt under section 221.031, subdivision 2c. (c) The fee for a permit issued under this subdivision is $500, or a proportional amount as provided in section 169.86, subdivision 5. Subd. 3. Requirements; restrictions. (a) A vehicle or combination of vehicles operating under this section: (1) is subject to axle weight limitations under section 169.824, subdivision 1; (2) is subject to seasonal load restrictions under section 169.87; (3) is subject to bridge load limits posted under section 169.84; (4) may only be operated on paved streets and highways other than interstate highways; (5) may not be operated with loads that exceed the manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating as affixed to the vehicle, or other certification of gross vehicle weight rating complying with Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, sections 567.4 to 567.7; (6) must be issued a permit from each road authority having jurisdiction over a road on which the vehicle is operated, if required; (7) must comply with the requirements of section 169.851, subdivision 4; and (8) must have brakes on all wheels. (b) The percentage allowances for exceeding gross weights if transporting unfinished forest products under section 168.013, subdivision 3, paragraph (b), or for the first haul of unprocessed or raw farm products or unfinished forest products under section 168.013, subdivision 3, paragraph (d), clause (3), do not apply to a vehicle or combination of vehicles operated under this section. (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), clause (4), a vehicle or combination of vehicles hauling fluid milk under a permit issued by the commissioner of transportation may also operate on interstate highways as provided under United States Code, title 23, section 127. Subd. 4. Deposit of revenues. Revenue from the permits issued by the commissioner under this section must be deposited in the bridge inspection and signing account as provided under section 169.86, subdivision 5b. Subd. 5. Expiration date. Upon request of the permit applicant, the expiration date for a permit issued under this section must be the same as the expiration date of the permitted vehicle's registration. 169.866 SPECIAL CANOLA-HAULING VEHICLE PERMIT. Subdivision 1. Special three-unit vehicle permit. The commissioner may issue a permit for a vehicle that meets the following requirements: (1) is a combination of vehicles, including a truck-tractor and a semitrailer drawing one additional trailer or semitrailer, and no semitrailer used in the three-vehicle combination has an overall length in excess of 28-1/2 feet; (2) has a maximum gross vehicle weight of 105,500 pounds; (3) complies with the axle weight limits in section 169.824; (4) complies with the tire weight limits in section 169.823, or the tire manufacturers' recommended load, whichever is less; (5) is operated only in this state on marked Trunk Highway 175 from Hallock to the North Dakota border, on U.S. Highway 75 from Hallock to Donaldson, and on marked Trunk Highway 11 from Donaldson to the North Dakota border; and (6) the seasonal weight increases authorized under section 169.826, subdivision 1, do not apply. Subd. 2. Restrictions. Vehicles issued permits under subdivision 1 must comply with the following restrictions: (1) the vehicle must be operated in compliance with seasonal load restrictions under section 169.87; (2) the vehicle may not be operated on the interstate highway system or national network highways; and (3) the vehicle may be operated on streets or highways under the control of local authorities only upon the approval of the local authority; however, vehicles may have reasonable access to terminals and facilities for food, fuel, repairs, and rest, and for continuity of route within one mile of the national network as provided by section 169.81, subdivision 3, and by the Code of Federal Regulations, title 23, section 658.19. Subd. 3. Permit fee; appropriation. Vehicle permits issued under subdivision 1 must be annual permits. The fee is $850 for each vehicle, or a proportional amount as provided in section 169.86, subdivision 5, and must be deposited in the trunk highway fund. An amount sufficient to administer the permit program is appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner for the costs of administering the permit program. Subd. 4. Expiration date. Upon request of the permit applicant, the expiration date for a permit issued under this section must be the same as the expiration date of the permitted vehicle's registration. 169.8665 SPECIAL SOYBEAN MEAL-HAULING VEHICLE PERMIT. Subdivision 1. Special three-unit vehicle permit. The commissioner may issue a permit for a vehicle that transports soybean meal and meets the following requirements: (1) is a combination of vehicles, including a truck-tractor and a semitrailer drawing one additional semitrailer, and no semitrailer used in the three-vehicle combination has an overall length in excess of 28-1/2 feet; (2) does not exceed a maximum gross vehicle weight of 106,000 pounds; and (3) is operated only in this state on marked U.S. Highway 75 in Crookston to marked U.S. Highway 2, and on marked U.S. Highway 2 from Crookston to the North Dakota border. Subd. 2. Special two-unit vehicle permit. The commissioner may issue a permit for a vehicle that transports soybean meal and meets the following requirements: (1) is a combination of vehicles consisting of a truck-tractor and a single semitrailer that may exceed 48 feet, but not 53 feet, if the distance from the kingpin to the centerline of the rear axle group of the semitrailer does not exceed 43 feet; (2) does not exceed a maximum gross vehicle weight of 106,000 pounds; and (3) is operated only on the highways specified in subdivision 1, clause (3). Subd. 3. Restrictions. (a) A vehicle issued a permit under subdivision 1 or 2: (1) is subject to the axle weight limits in section 169.824; (2) is subject to bridge load limits posted pursuant to section 169.84; (3) is subject to seasonal load restrictions under section 169.87; (4) may not be operated with a load that exceeds the tire manufacturer's recommended load under section 169.823, the manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating as affixed to the vehicle, or other certification of gross weight rating under Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, sections 567.4 to 567.7; (5) may not be operated on the interstate highway system; and (6) may be operated on streets or highways under the control of a local authority only upon the approval of the local authority. However, vehicles may have reasonable access to terminals and facilities for food, fuel, repairs, and rest, and for continuity of route within one mile of the national network as provided by section 169.81, subdivision 3, and Code of Federal Regulations, title 23, section 658.19. (b) The seasonal weight increases authorized under section 169.826 do not apply to permits issued under this section. Subd. 4. Permit fee; appropriation. Vehicle permits issued under subdivision 1 must be annual permits. The fee is $850 for each vehicle, or a proportional amount as provided in section 169.86, subdivision 5, and must be deposited in the trunk highway fund. An amount sufficient to administer the permit program is appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner for the costs of administering the permit program. Subd. 5. Expiration date. Upon request of the permit applicant, the expiration date for a permit issued under this section must be the same as the expiration date of the permitted vehicle's registration. 169.868 SPECIAL FREIGHT DISTRIBUTION PERMIT. Subdivision 1. Six-axle vehicles. (a) A road authority may issue an annual permit for a vehicle or combination of vehicles with a combination of six or more axles to haul freight and to be operated with a gross vehicle weight up to: (1) 90,000 pounds; and (2) 99,000 pounds during the period set by the commissioner under section 169.826, subdivision 1. (b) The fee for a permit issued under this subdivision is $300. Subd. 2. Seven-axle vehicles. (a) A road authority may issue an annual permit for a vehicle or combination of vehicles with a combination of seven or more axles to haul freight and to be operated with a gross vehicle weight up to: (1) 97,000 pounds; and (2) 99,000 pounds during the period set by the commissioner under section 169.826, subdivision 1. (b) The fee for a permit issued under this subdivision is $500. Subd. 3. Restrictions. Vehicles issued permits under this section must comply with all requirements and restrictions in section 169.865, subdivision 3. A vehicle may be operated under a permit issued under this section only to haul freight to or from a distribution facility that is: (1) constructed on or after July 1, 2013; and (2) located within the Department of Transportation District 4. Subd. 4. Deposit of revenues. Revenue from the permits issued by the commissioner under this section must be deposited in the bridge inspection and signing account as provided under section 169.86, subdivision 5b. 169.869 ROAD CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS SPECIAL PERMIT. Subdivision 1. Definition. For purposes of this section, "road construction materials" means street or highway construction materials, including but not limited to aggregate material as defined in section 298.75, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), hot mix asphalt, plastic concrete, cementitious materials, concrete admixtures, asphalt cement, and recycled road materials. Subd. 2. Six-axle vehicles. (a) A road authority may issue an annual permit authorizing a vehicle or combination of vehicles with a total of six or more axles to haul road construction materials and be operated with a gross vehicle weight of up to: (1) 90,000 pounds; and (2) 99,000 pounds during the period set by the commissioner under section 169.826, subdivision 1. (b) The fee for a permit issued under this subdivision is $300, or a proportional amount as provided in section 169.86, subdivision 5. Subd. 3. Seven-axle vehicles. (a) A road authority may issue an annual permit authorizing a vehicle or combination of vehicles with a total of seven or more axles to haul road construction materials and be operated with a gross vehicle weight of up to: (1) 97,000 pounds; and (2) 99,000 pounds during the period set by the commissioner under section 169.826, subdivision 1. (b) The fee for a permit issued under this subdivision is $500, or a proportional amount as provided in section 169.86, subdivision 5. Subd. 4. Authority; restrictions. A vehicle or combination of vehicles operating under this section: (1) may only be operated on paved or unpaved streets and highways, other than interstate highways; (2) must comply with the requirements and restrictions in section 169.865, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (3), (5), (7), and (8); and (3) must be operated in compliance with truck route requirements and vehicle weight restrictions, as established under section 169.87, subdivision 1, by a local road authority or the commissioner. Subd. 5. Revenues. Revenue from the permits issued by the commissioner under this section must be deposited in the bridge inspection and signing account under section 169.86, subdivision 5b. Subd. 6. Expiration date. Upon request of the permit applicant, the expiration date for a permit issued under this section must be the same as the expiration date of the permitted vehicle's registration. Subd. 7. Permit information. The commissioner must make information available to local road authorities on an Internet website that identifies permit issuances under this section and the counties in which a vehicle with a permit is intended to be operated. Subd. 8. Local preferred routes. A local road authority may identify local preferred routes for operating a vehicle on local streets and highways under a permit issued in this section. A holder of a permit issued in this section and any person seeking to apply for a permit are encouraged to: (1) upon request of a local road authority, provide comment on identification of preferred routes; and (2) make reasonable efforts to operate a vehicle on the preferred routes when operating under the permit. 169.87 SEASONAL LOAD RESTRICTION; ROUTE DESIGNATION. Subd. 4. Vehicle transporting milk. A weight restriction imposed under subdivision 1 by the commissioner of transportation or a local road authority, or imposed by subdivision 2, does not apply to a vehicle transporting milk from the point of production to the point of first processing if, at the time the weight restriction is exceeded, the vehicle is carrying milk loaded at only one point of production. This subdivision does not authorize a vehicle described in this subdivision to exceed a weight restriction of five tons per axle by more than two tons per axle. 169.871 EXCESS WEIGHT; CIVIL PENALTY. Subd. 1a. Special permit violations. (a) The owner or lessee of a vehicle that is operated with a gross weight in excess of an adjusted weight limit and a shipper who ships or tenders goods for shipment in a single truck or combination vehicle that exceeds an adjusted weight limit is liable for a civil penalty. The civil penalty is the greater of (1) as calculated at a rate of five cents per pound for each pound in excess of the highest weight allowed by the permit or under section 169.826, subdivision 1, or (2) $100. (b) Any penalty imposed upon a defendant under this subdivision shall not exceed the penalty prescribed by this subdivision. Any fine paid by the defendant in a criminal overweight action that arose from the same overweight violation may not be applied toward payment of the civil penalty under this subdivision. A peace officer or Department of Public Safety employee described in section 299D.06 who cites a driver for a violation of the adjusted weight limit shall give written notice to the driver that the driver or another may also be liable for the civil penalty provided in this subdivision in the same or separate proceedings. (c) For purposes of this subdivision, "adjusted weight limit" means a weight limit (1) imposed by a permit issued under this chapter, or (2) imposed under section 169.826, subdivision 1.